California, session 20252026, AB1049.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18932 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18932. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the federal and state laws and regulations governing the federal Food Stamp Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter.(b) Federal deeming rules and exemptions governing the federal Food Stamp Program shall also govern the program provided for under this chapter, except that for immigrants with affidavits of support under Section 1183a of Title 8 of the United States Code who do not meet exemptions from deeming, the period for deeming of a sponsor’s income and resources shall be three years from the date of the sponsor’s execution of the affidavit of support pursuant to Section 1183a of Title 8 of the United States Code. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall not apply to the program established under this chapter.(c)Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, immigrants who are victims of abuse by their sponsor or sponsor’s spouse shall be exempt from deeming. Abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse is also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:(1)Police, government agency, or court records or files.(2)Documentation from a domestic violence program, or from a legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.(3)A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.(4)Physical evidence of abuse.(5)If the victim cannot provide additional evidence of abuse, then the sworn statement shall be sufficient if the county makes a determination documented in writing in the case file that the applicant is credible.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 2.___________________